Washington statutes.
RCW 36.68.080

Penalty for violations of regulations.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, any person violating any rules or regulations adopted by the board of county commissioners relating to parks, playgrounds, or other recreational facilities is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, violation of such a rule or regulation relating to traffic including parking, standing, stopping, and pedestrian offenses is a traffic infraction.

(b) Violation of such a rule or regulation equivalent to those provisions of Title 46 RCW set forth in RCW 46.63.020 remains a misdemeanor.

[ 2003 c 53 s 205; 1979 ex.s. c 136 s 36; 1963 c 4 s 36.68.080. Prior: 1949 c 94 s 8; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 3991-21.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Effective date—Severability—1979 ex.s. c 136: See notes following RCW 46.63.010.